District of Columbia statutes.
24-929

Removal.

An eligible juvenile offender participating in the BOOT CAMP may be removed at the discretion of the Director. The Director shall promulgate rules and procedures for removal of an eligible juvenile offender from the BOOT CAMP. The rules and procedures shall include the following provisions:

(1)

Removal from the BOOT CAMP for any reason shall be treated as a violation of conditional release.

(2)

An eligible juvenile offender may petition for removal from the program. The Director shall grant the petition for removal upon a finding of good cause.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 401, 40 DCR 5768
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 19, 41 DCR 5193

History

1981 Ed., § 24-829.

Prior Codifications